asdf/dicionarios/pt_pt.aff
SFX 67 Y 46
SFX 67   ogia            ógico           logia           +CAT=adj,G=m,N=s
SFX 67   ogia            ógica           logia           +CAT=adj,G=f,N=s
SFX 67   ogia            ógicos          logia           +CAT=adj,G=m,N=p
SFX 67   ogia            ógicas          logia           +CAT=adj,G=f,N=p
SFX 67   ografia         ógrafo          ografia         +CAT=a_nc,G=m,N=s
SFX 67   ografia         ógrafa          ografia         +CAT=a_nc,G=f,N=s
SFX 67   ografia         ógrafos         ografia         +CAT=a_nc,G=m,N=p
SFX 67   ografia         ógrafas         ografia         +CAT=a_nc,G=f,N=p
SFX 67   omia            ómico           nomia           +CAT=adj,G=m,N=s
SFX 67   omia            ómica           nomia           +CAT=adj,G=f,N=s
SFX 67   omia            ómicos          nomia           +CAT=adj,G=m,N=p
SFX 67   omia            ómicas          nomia           +CAT=adj,G=f,N=p
SFX 67   ia              íaco            mania           +CAT=adj,G=m,N=s
SFX 67   ia              íaca            mania           +CAT=adj,G=m,N=s
SFX 67   ia              íacos           mania           +CAT=adj,G=m,N=s
SFX 67   ia              íacas           mania           +CAT=adj,G=m,N=s
SFX 67   acia            ático           cracia          +CAT=adj,G=m,N=s
SFX 67   acia            ática           cracia          +CAT=adj,G=f,N=s
SFX 67   acia            áticos          cracia          +CAT=adj,G=m,N=p
SFX 67   acia            áticas          cracia          +CAT=adj,G=f,N=p
SFX 67   icultura        ícola           icultura        +CAT=adj,G=_,N=s
SFX 67   icultura        ícolas          icultura        +CAT=adj,G=_,N=p
SFX 67   arquia          árquico         arquia          +CAT=adj,G=m,N=s
SFX 67   arquia          árquica         arquia          +CAT=adj,G=f,N=s
SFX 67   arquia          árquicos        arquia          +CAT=adj,G=m,N=p
SFX 67   arquia          árquicas        arquia          +CAT=adj,G=f,N=p
SFX 67   obia            óbico           fobia           +CAT=adj,G=m,N=s
SFX 67   obia            óbica           fobia           +CAT=adj,G=f,N=s
SFX 67   obia            óbicos          fobia           +CAT=adj,G=m,N=p
SFX 67   obia            óbicas          fobia           +CAT=adj,G=f,N=p
SFX 67   atia            ático           patia           +CAT=adj,G=m,N=s
SFX 67   atia            ática           patia           +CAT=adj,G=f,N=s
SFX 67   atia            áticos          patia           +CAT=adj,G=m,N=p
SFX 67   atia            áticas          patia           +CAT=adj,G=f,N=p
SFX 67   etria           étrico          metria          +CAT=adj,G=m,N=s
SFX 67   etria           étrica          metria          +CAT=adj,G=m,N=s
SFX 67   etria           étricos         metria          +CAT=adj,G=f,N=p
SFX 67   etria           étricas         metria          +CAT=adj,G=f,N=p
SFX 67   orfia           órfico          morfia          +CAT=adj,G=m,N=s
SFX 67   orfia           órfica          morfia          +CAT=adj,G=f,N=s
SFX 67   orfia           órficos         morfia          +CAT=adj,G=m,N=p
SFX 67   orfia           órficas         morfia          +CAT=adj,G=f,N=p
SFX 67   morfismo        mórfico         morfismo        +CAT=adj,G=m,N=s
SFX 67   morfismo        mórfica         morfismo        +CAT=adj,G=f,N=s
SFX 67   morfismo        mórficos        morfismo        +CAT=adj,G=m,N=p
SFX 67   morfismo        mórficas        morfismo        +CAT=adj,G=f,N=p

SFX 68 Y 36
SFX 68   o               íssimo          [^cçg]o         +GR=sup,G=m,N=s
SFX 68   co              quíssimo        co              +GR=sup,G=m,N=s
SFX 68   ço              císsimo         ço              +GR=sup,G=m,N=s
SFX 68   go              guíssimo        go              +GR=sup,G=m,N=s
SFX 68   e               íssimo          e               +GR=sup,G=m,N=s
SFX 68   0               íssimo          [lr]            +GR=sup,G=m,N=s
SFX 68   ês              esíssimo        ês              +GR=sup,G=m,N=s
SFX 68   z               císsimo         z               +GR=sup,G=m,N=s
SFX 68   ável            abilíssimo      ável            +GR=sup,G=m,N=s
SFX 68   o               íssima          [^cçg]o         +GR=sup,G=f,N=s
SFX 68   co              quíssima        co              +GR=sup,G=f,N=s
SFX 68   ço              císsima         ço              +GR=sup,G=f,N=s
SFX 68   go              guíssima        go              +GR=sup,G=f,N=s
SFX 68   e               íssima          e               +GR=sup,G=f,N=s
SFX 68   0               íssima          [lr]            +GR=sup,G=f,N=s
SFX 68   ês              esíssima        ês              +GR=sup,G=f,N=s
SFX 68   z               císsima         z               +GR=sup,G=f,N=s
SFX 68   ável            abilíssima      ável            +GR=sup,G=f,N=s
SFX 68   o               íssimos         [^cçg]o         +GR=sup,N=p
SFX 68   co              quíssimos       co              +GR=sup,N=p
SFX 68   ço              císsimos        ço              +GR=sup,N=p
SFX 68   go              guíssimos       go              +GR=sup,N=p
SFX 68   e               íssimos         e               +GR=sup,N=p
SFX 68   0               íssimos         [lr]            +GR=sup,N=p
SFX 68   ês              esíssimos       ês              +GR=sup,N=p
SFX 68   z               císsimos        z               +GR=sup,N=p
SFX 68   ável            abilíssimos     ável            +GR=sup,N=p
SFX 68   o               íssimas         [^cçg]o         +GR=sup,G=f,N=p
SFX 68   co              quíssimas       co              +GR=sup,G=f,N=p
SFX 68   ço              císsimas        ço              +GR=sup,G=f,N=p
SFX 68   go              guíssimas       go              +GR=sup,G=f,N=p
SFX 68   e               íssimas         e               +GR=sup,G=f,N=p
SFX 68   0               íssimas         [lr]            +GR=sup,G=f,N=p
SFX 68   ês              esíssimas       ês              +GR=sup,G=f,N=p
SFX 68   z               císsimas        z               +GR=sup,G=f,N=p
SFX 68   ável            abilíssimas     ável            +GR=sup,G=f,N=p

SFX 69 Y 24
SFX 69   o               ista            [^cçãi]o        +CAT=a_nc,FSEM=ista
SFX 69   co              quista          co              +CAT=a_nc,FSEM=ista
SFX 69   ço              cista           ço              +CAT=a_nc,FSEM=ista
SFX 69   ção             cionista        ção             +CAT=a_nc,FSEM=ista
SFX 69   são             sionista        são             +CAT=a_nc,FSEM=ista
SFX 69   io              ísta            io              +CAT=a_nc,FSEM=ista
SFX 69   a               ista            [^içg]a         +CAT=a_nc,FSEM=ista
SFX 69   a               sta             ia              +CAT=a_nc,FSEM=ista
SFX 69   ça              cista           ça              +CAT=a_nc,FSEM=ista
SFX 69   a               uista           ga              +CAT=a_nc,FSEM=ista
SFX 69   e               ista            e               +CAT=a_nc,FSEM=ista
SFX 69   0               ista            [lr]            +CAT=a_nc,FSEM=ista
SFX 69   o               istas           [^cçã]o         +CAT=a_nc,N=p,FSEM=ista
SFX 69   co              quistas         co              +CAT=a_nc,N=p,FSEM=ista
SFX 69   ço              cistas          ço              +CAT=a_nc,N=p,FSEM=ista
SFX 69   ção             cionistas       ção             +CAT=a_nc,N=p,FSEM=ista
SFX 69   são             sionistas       são             +CAT=a_nc,N=p,FSEM=ista
SFX 69   io              ístas           io              +CAT=a_nc,N=p,FSEM=ista
SFX 69   a               istas           [^içg]a         +CAT=a_nc,N=p,FSEM=ista
SFX 69   a               stas            ia              +CAT=a_nc,N=p,FSEM=ista
SFX 69   ça              cistas          ça              +CAT=a_nc,N=p,FSEM=ista
SFX 69   a               uistas          ga              +CAT=a_nc,N=p,FSEM=ista
SFX 69   e               istas           e               +CAT=a_nc,N=p,FSEM=ista
SFX 69   0               istas           [lr]            +CAT=a_nc,N=p,FSEM=ista

SFX 70 Y 6
SFX 70   ar              ável            ar              +CAT=adj,G=_,N=s,FSEM=vel
SFX 70   er              ível            er              +CAT=adj,G=_,N=s,FSEM=vel
SFX 70   ir              ível            ir              +CAT=adj,G=_,N=s,FSEM=vel
SFX 70   ar              áveis           ar              +CAT=adj,G=_,N=p,FSEM=vel
SFX 70   er              íveis           er              +CAT=adj,G=_,N=p,FSEM=vel
SFX 70   ir              íveis           ir              +CAT=adj,G=_,N=p,FSEM=vel

SFX 71 Y 20
SFX 71   0               so              o               +CAT=adj,G=m,N=s,FSEM=oso
SFX 71   0               sa              o               +CAT=adj,G=f,N=s,FSEM=oso
SFX 71   0               sos             o               +CAT=adj,G=m,N=p,FSEM=oso
SFX 71   0               sas             o               +CAT=adj,G=f,N=p,FSEM=oso
SFX 71   a               oso             a               +CAT=adj,G=m,N=s,FSEM=oso
SFX 71   a               osa             a               +CAT=adj,G=f,N=s,FSEM=oso
SFX 71   a               osos            a               +CAT=adj,G=m,N=p,FSEM=oso
SFX 71   a               osas            a               +CAT=adj,G=f,N=p,FSEM=oso
SFX 71   ção             cioso           ção             +CAT=adj,G=m,N=s,FSEM=oso
SFX 71   ção             ciosa           ção             +CAT=adj,G=f,N=s,FSEM=oso
SFX 71   ção             ciosos          ção             +CAT=adj,G=m,N=p,FSEM=oso
SFX 71   ção             ciosas          ção             +CAT=adj,G=f,N=p,FSEM=oso
SFX 71   e               oso             e               +CAT=adj,G=m,N=s,FSEM=oso
SFX 71   e               osa             e               +CAT=adj,G=f,N=s,FSEM=oso
SFX 71   e               osos            e               +CAT=adj,G=m,N=p,FSEM=oso
SFX 71   e               osas            e               +CAT=adj,G=f,N=p,FSEM=oso
SFX 71   0               oso             [^aeiou]        +CAT=adj,G=m,N=s,FSEM=oso
SFX 71   0               osa             [^aeiou]        +CAT=adj,G=f,N=s,FSEM=oso
SFX 71   0               osos            [^aeiou]        +CAT=adj,G=m,N=p,FSEM=oso
SFX 71   0               osas            [^aeiou]        +CAT=adj,G=f,N=p,FSEM=oso

SFX 72 Y 4
SFX 72   o               eiro            o               +G=m,N=s,FSEM=eiro
SFX 72   o               eiros           o               +G=m,N=p,FSEM=eiro
SFX 72   a               eira            a               +G=f,N=s,FSEM=eiro
SFX 72   a               eiras           a               +G=f,N=p,FSEM=eiro

SFX 73 Y 6
SFX 73   0               zinho           [^ã][eo]        +GR=dim
SFX 73   0               inho            l               +GR=dim
SFX 73   0               zinha           [^ã][eo]        +G=f,GR=dim
SFX 73   0               inha            l               +G=f,GR=dim
SFX 73   0               zinhos          [^ã][eo]        +N=p,GR=dim
SFX 73   0               inhos           l               +N=p,GR=dim
